Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0521.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 CHAPTER XVII Sec. 16w. (1) This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 750 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 750.451(3) Pub ord GE Prostitution â various offenses â third or subsequent offense 25 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 750.451(4) Person EB Soliciting a person under 18 years of age to commit prostitution 520 750.452 Pub ord E Keeping a house of prostitution 5 750.455 Pub ord B Pandering 20 750.456 Person B Placing spouse into prostitution 20 750.457 Pub ord B Accepting earnings of a prostitute 20 750.458 Person B Prostitution â detaining person for debt 20 750.459(1) Person B Transporting a person for prostitution 20 750.459(2) Person E Selling travel services to facilitate prostitution or human trafficking in other jurisdictions 5 750.459(3) Person D Selling travel services to facilitate prostitution or human trafficking in other jurisdictions involving a minor 10 750.462f(1)(a) Person DB Human trafficking violation 1020 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 750.462f(1)(b) Person C Human trafficking violation resulting in bodily injury 15 750.462f(1)(c) Person B Human trafficking violation resulting in serious bodily injury 20 750.462f(1)(d) 750.462f(1)(b) Person A Human trafficking violation involving death or the commission of certain felonies Life 750.462f(2) Person BA Obtaining a minor for commercial sexual activity or for forced labor or services 20Life 750.462f(3) Person Variable Attempting, conspiring, or soliciting another to violate human trafficking laws Variable 750.465a(1)(b) Property G Operating audiovisual recording device in a theatrical facility â second offense 2 750.465a(1)(c) Property F Operating audiovisual recording device in a theatrical facility â third or subsequent offense 4 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 (2) For a violation of section 462f(3) of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.462f, determine the offense category, offense variable level, and prior record variable level based on the underlying offense. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) Senate Bill No. 520. (b) Senate Bill No. 705.